Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 7. Pawnshop Operations

§ 40-14-359.
Definitions; application.

As used in W.S.

40-14-359

through

40-14-361

:

“Pawnbroker” means a person licensed pursuant to W.S.

40-14-634

to engage in the business of making pawn transactions;

“Pawn finance charge” means the sum of all charges, payable directly or indirectly by the customer and imposed directly or indirectly by the pawnbroker as an incident of the pawn transactions;

“Pawn transaction” means the act of lending money on the security of pledged tangible personal property, or the act of purchasing tangible personal property on the condition that it may be redeemed or repurchased by the seller for a fixed price within a fixed period of time.

W.S.

40-14-359

through

40-14-361

shall not supersede the rights of cities, towns and counties to regulate and license pawnshops in any fashion consistent with this act. The rights of cities, towns and counties to regulate pawn finance charges and maturities are preempted.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 62, § 1; 1989, ch. 72, § 1; 1996, ch. 86, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-360.
Pawn finance charge; limits on amount financed and terms; minimum pawn finance charge.

No pawnbroker may contract for, charge or receive any amount as a charge in connection with a pawn transaction other than a pawn finance charge. No pawn finance charge shall exceed twenty percent (20%) per month on the unpaid principal balance of the pawn transaction.

The amount financed in any one (1) pawn transaction to any one (1) customer shall not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000.00).

The maturity date of a pawn transaction shall be one (1) calendar month. The period shall expire on the same date in the succeeding month if there is such a date, otherwise on the last day of the succeeding month. If the expiration date is not a business day, the period expires on the next business day.

Pawn finance charges are fully earned on the day the loan is made.

Pawn transactions may be renewed from month to month without additional disclosures provided:

There is no change in the original terms; and

Pawn finance charges are not compounded.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the lender may contract for and receive a minimum pawn finance charge of not more than five dollars ($5.00).

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 62, § 1; 1989, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 40-14-361.
Limitation on agreement and practices.

No pawnbroker shall make an agreement requiring the personal liability of a customer in connection with a pawn transaction. No customer may be required to redeem pledged goods or make any payment on a pawn transaction. The sole remedy of a pawnbroker for nonpayment of a loan by a customer or failure to redeem or repurchase tangible personal property by a customer in a pawn transaction is the right to title of the pledged tangible personal property.

Pawnbrokers shall not make any charge for insurance in connection with a pawn transaction.

Pawnbrokers shall post in a conspicuous place on their premises a schedule of business days and hours during which pawn transactions may be redeemed.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 62, § 1; 1989, ch. 72, § 1.